Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Part 3

Endorsement and Docketing

26-1-301. Endorsement on execution.

The clerk shall endorse on the execution, when issued, the date and amount of the judgment, and the items of the bill of costs, written in words, and the amounts distinctly stated in figures, and the date of issuance.

Code 1858, § 3015 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 9; 1796, ch. 7, § 9; 1803, ch. 6, § 2); Shan., § 4743; Code 1932, § 8877; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-121.

26-1-302. Docket entry.

The clerk shall also enter upon the execution docket the date of the issuance of such execution, and to what county and officer issued; the return of the officer, with the date of such return; the dates and amounts of all moneys received into or paid out of the office thereon; the entries to be made at the time of the issuance, receipt, or payment, as the case may be.

Code 1858, § 3016 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 8, § 2); Shan., § 4744; Code 1932, § 8878; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-122.

Law Reviews.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

26-1-303. Penalties for failure to endorse or docket.

Any clerk neglecting § 26-1-301 or § 26-1-302 is liable to a penalty of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), to be recovered by action, one-half (½) to the informer and the other one-half (½) to the state, to damages at the suit of the party aggrieved, and commits a Class C misdemeanor, for which, on conviction, such clerk shall be removed from office.

Code 1858, § 3017 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 9); Shan., § 4745; Code 1932, § 8879; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-123; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

26-1-304. Endorsement by executive officer.

The officer to whom an execution is legally issued, shall, in like manner, endorse thereon the day on which such officer received it, any levy, sale or other act done by virtue thereof, with the date, and the dates and amounts of any receipts or payments in satisfaction thereof, the endorsements to be made at the time of the receipt or act done.

Any officer, who fails or neglects to comply with the provisions of this section, forfeits one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) to any person who will sue therefor, and also commits a Class C misdemeanor, for which, on conviction, such officer may be removed from office.

Code 1858, §§ 3018, 3019 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 9); Shan., §§ 4746, 4747; Code 1932, §§ 8880, 8881; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-124; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 28, 29.